dev/vro-est.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%'

%{e%}
%{a%}
%{u%}
%{ö%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Dict ;
Punct ; 
Digits ;

LEXICON Dict 

päävä:pä%{e%}v%{a%} Alpha "weight: 0.5" ; 
tüü:t%{ö%}%{ö%} Alpha "weight: 0.5" ; 

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

a:a AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
b:b AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
c:c AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
d:d AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
e:e AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
g:g AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
h:h AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
k:k AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
m:m AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
n:n AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
o:o AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
p:p AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
q:q AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
r:r AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
s:s AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
š:š AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
t:t AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
v:v AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
w:w AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
õ:õ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ä:ä AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ö:ö AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ü:ü AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
x:x AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
z:z AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ž:ž AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
%':%' AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;


LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
